<comment>I'm not trying to disagree with the analysis here—it may well be valid.  But I think it’s possible (just maybe) that Democrats detect the odor of corruption around Hillary, and would rather have someone who won’t be indicted between now and November.  I’m not saying she will be indicted (I actually don’t expect that), but if you’re a Democrat, why take a chance?  In a year when the Republicans are absolutely determined to nominate an unelectable candidate, why not seize the opportunity to nominate someone you really believe in, rather than someone who might lose the election because of the smell of scandal?After all, as Hillary herself said,  ‘You can’t accomplish anything in government unless you win!’”</comment>

<comment>with the email dump exposing the lies and making it obvious laws were broken, even an announcement that there would be no indictment is going to hurt (ask Darren Wilson if he thinks a lack of indictment ends the story). DOJ has to decide if they want to hurt Hillary and Obama (no indictment) or just Hillary (indictment). That may not be a tough call on Pennsylvania Avenue.</comment>

<comment>It's an easy call for Obama were he a Hillary</comment>

<comment>It never occured to you that, having nothing to hang her with (and showing their @$& after 11 hours of under-oath interrogation) that creating the "odor of corruption" has been the Republican's game plan all along?In short, you're taking right wing talking points as the gospel truth while deluding yourself into thinking Bernie Sanders is a strong general election candidate when in fact he makes George McGovern look like Teddy Roosevelt. A 60's burn out still butt-hurt over Henry Kissinger is what you REALLY want?</comment>

<comment>I'm certainly not basing anything on her testimony in October, nor am I just listening to the GOP (though one would be foolish to only listen to HRC's side in this).  For the life of me, I don't understand how anyone on either side can think they know how the endgame will play out on this.“Nothing to hang her on”?  Sorry, but the FBI is too professional to pursue their investigation through the media—no one on the outside knows what they’re working with, but to a casual observer, it’s hard to believe that, if there was nothing whatsoever to worry about, that they would have been working on this so long.  It may come to nothing, but we just can’t know.On the other hand, there are many on the right who assume that she’s going to prison.  I can’t imagine that ever happening, for a number of reasons.  However, I think that the appearance of impropriety will be enough by itself to damage her campaign, possibly fatally.For myself, I value honesty or integrity—insofar as it can be found—in politicians.  Yeah, I know, it’s a rare commodity, but I think Bernie has it, and he will likely get my vote.</comment>

<comment>Considering that under Obama, the DoJ has become completely politicized, which is to say, completely corrupt, nobody on the right is assuming that Hillary will ever be indicted, much less convicted; only that she richly deserves to be.</comment>

<comment>She's got nothing to lose.  If she wins, the DOJ will be hers.  If she loses, the Republicans will drop the investigations because she will just be another old lady with cankles.  Or............she could quickly plead guilty and Obama pardons her...........Pretty sneaky huh?  AmeriCCCPa is now Venezuela. Buenos Dias.</comment>

<comment>Since no one from the Bush Administration faced any repercussions for the torture at Abu Graib (and other locations) or the many questionable spying and detention operations, I would assume Hillary's much more nebulous actions regarding email would certainly enjoy the same level of "executive privilege" and immunity. Given that the Department of Defense can't seem to keep confidential employee information safe on its own servers, Hillary's email seems sadly to be of a piece with our ineffective approach to cyber-security. That doesn't make it right, but it does make it harder to prosecute, especially since we haven't shown that any of the info was leaked or hacked.</comment>

<comment>Thanks for the well-thought out reply.What concerns me, personally, about Hillary's server is that it seems to indicate that she wanted personal oversight and control over what was made public, and from this I can't help but conclude that she's trying to avoid the FOIA, which is, of course, a law. I honestly believe that she doesn't understand that the law applies to her, as long as she can get away with it.Re the Bush Administration crimes. I think Obama is to blame for this, in a way that GOP partisans will never admit. When Obama came into office, I think he was as genuinely interested in bi-partisanship as one could expect (especially considering that he was the first person in 20 years to receive a outright majority of the popular vote). This wish to be conciliatory in victory, combined with a newfound appreciation for the complexities of national intelligence in the midst of war, caused him, I believe, to look away from possible Bush Administration wrongdoing. And we pay the price for his wish to play nice, to this day.If Obama really has looked away from what he knows to be criminal wrongdoing, the it will be perhaps the second-greatest action to to destroy rule of law in this country, surpassed only by Ford's pardon of Nixon.</comment>

<comment>You have only to look at the failure to indict anyone on Wall Street for their clear, easily proven fraud to see what kind of Justice Obama has created.</comment>

<comment>Yeah, but shouldn't the Bush Administration have pursued this as well?  How is it that the Bush Administration poured all this money into these banks, when they had so clearly done wrong?  Why not offer a swap--jail time for those responsible, in return for loans to save your sorry @sses.</comment>

<comment>In the world of Democrats actually being in prison is the ONLY reason for not running for office and winning.  Ethics, integrity competence, accomplishments, etc...............irrelevant.   PS  Being a good liar helps too, along with promising a lot of free stuff to the gullible.  In other words Bernie has a slight chance.</comment>

<comment>A 60's burn out still butt-hurt over Henry Kissinger is what you REALLY want?Oh, I get it.  You're a parody of a bitter Hillary supporter, since there's no way an actual adult person could think that this is a reasonable way to speak about a candidate supported by such a large part of the party base.Should I parody a Sanders supporter to fit into this sketch?  "Hillary Clinton is going to make John Bolten Secretary of State, and will only let Wall Street Bankers buy legal weed!"</comment>

<comment>Well, Bernie brought up Kissinger as if he has anything to do with what's going on today. Bernie does seem moored in the 60's. "The Establishment", "Union Jobs", and now Henry Kissinger. The 60's are over. Different economy, different world, different solutions needed for different problems. </comment>

<comment>Well, Bernie brought up Kissinger as if he has anything to do with what's going on today. Hillary Clinton has publically praised Kissinger and stated that she is grateful for his mentorship.  So we have a candidate who is an advocate of "muscular" foreign policy, and who voted in support of the stupidest foreign policy move thus far in the 21st century, praising someone who should be dragged before the Hague for expanding a war of questionable legality into a straight-up war crime against Laos and Cambodia.Put another way:  Would you be giving Bernie a pass if he praised Pol Pot, who also killed hundreds of thousands of Cambodians for utterly stupid reasons?  Or would you just say, "Look, that all happened forty years ago, who cares how that statement reflects on his judgment?"See, the Kissinger and Iraq vote issues may seem silly to you, because you seem to have accepted that experience is the most important qualification in foreign policy.  But I would suggest that all the experience in the world can't ensure good judgment.  Indeed, I can name twenty-one Democratic Senators who showed better judgment than Senator Clinton (or Vice President Biden, for that matter) in the most important foreign policy vote Congress has faced in the last two decades.  Maybe one of them should have been Secretary of State.</comment>

<comment>Kissinger was national security advisor, not the president. If you think war crimes were committed, take it up with his boss. The only person i've ever read saying such was Christopher Hitchins - a drunken, dimwitted douchebag who later was a chearleader for the invasion of Iraq. Imagine the irony of quoting Hitchins to condemn H. Clinton's Iraq War vote. You're robbing Peter to pay Paul.Comparing Nixon/Kissinger to Pol Pot is ludicrous. Nixon normalized relations with China and ended a Vietnam War he didn't start. Yes he did bomb Laos and that bombing brought the Vietnamese to the bargaining table and led to them releasing US prisoners they were torturing. As usual with Bernie Sanders, nuance is slaughtered for the sake of catch phrases and complicated issues are reduced to one man. MOST serious foreign policy analysts praise Kissinger. Its simply not that controversial to do so.</comment>

<comment>Kissinger was national security advisor, not the president. If you think war crimes were committed, take it up with his boss.That is the opposite of the way our country has treated any criminal regime we've defeated and prosecuted.  "OK, Baath Party leadership, we got Saddam.  You guys head on home now."Yes he did bomb Laos and that bombing brought the Vietnamese to the bargaining table and led to them releasing US prisoners they were torturing.Oh, I get it.  You're part of the elusive "Democrats For Nixon's Conduct In Vietnam" constituency.  Because nobody else, except his conservative Republican apologists, has believed any of that utter tripe for over forty years.MOST serious foreign policy analysts praise Kissinger. Its simply not that controversial to do so.It's plenty controversial outside of the clubby foreign policy clusterfu*k.  By your logic, I guess guys like Roman Polanski get a pass.  I mean, he did rape a kid, but since his movies were so awesome, anyone who criticizes him is an idiot.I'm pretty sure that Hillary Clinton has enough foreign policy experience to find your explanation a bit simple.  Of course, she did get behind the greatest foreign policy failure in the century thus far, so she might not have the judgment to recognize it as rehashed nonsense from the 70s.</comment>

<comment>BS' supporters keep touting his vote against the IRAQ war as a great foreign policy achievement. He voted for the war in Afghanistan which was also determined to be a mistake, but his excuse was that he did so because of 9-11. He also voted for funding the Iraq war. I'm sure the BS supporters have seen the attached link. Even so, they can check out his complete voting record for themselves without spinning it.http://media.fyre.co/5Qm1HcxWS...BTW, judgement comes from experience. E.g. an 18 year old cannot be said to have more judgement than a 30 year old. What would it be based on?</comment>

<comment>Kissenger made alot of people money. and over threw democratically elected government s to do it......There is a word for it....FASCISM... WAR is a Racket as Smedley saidCrimes against Humanity: Why Is Henry Kissinger Walking Around Free?http://www.globalresearch.ca/c...</comment>

<comment>My main knock on Bernie's foreign policy is he just doesn't seem to think it is very important in the lives of ordinary citizens. He may well be right but it is still critical to have a president that understands the world as well as Obama does. I wish we could elect them both. Bernie would rein in Hillary's more hawkish tendencies and she might tone down his domestic ideas a bit. I don't think we are ready to lynch the bankers quite yet.</comment>

<comment>Sanders didn't bring up Kissinger. He responded to Hillary bringing him up, and actually praising him. Yeah, that's what we need, a candidate who takes advice from a war criminal.</comment>

<comment>She didn't praise him. Sec. Kisinger said Sec. Clinton ran that place better then anyone. So F'n what is wrong with that?</comment>

<comment>In my 41 years, Bernie Sanders supporters are one of the worst thing to happen to American politics, in my lifetime! I dig Bernie, but his supporters are even worse than the Trumpeters, the Tea Party Patriots, Occupy Wall Street, the Ron/Rand Paulites, Joe the Plumber, former half term Alaska Governor Sarah Palin, Cindy Sheehan, Ralph Nader, Dittoheads, Ross Perot, the moral majority, Hands across America, Christian Evangelicals, and the McGovernites.</comment>

<comment>I am very much Clinton supporter but that's really an extreme exaggeration.</comment>

<comment>Ha!  Now that's funny.</comment>

<comment>Take your head out of the sand, A. That 11 hour grilling was about Benghazi, which is a separate investigation. The email thing is real, serious, criminal, and growing. Every day we get new revelations of how Hillary & her gang systematically handled classified data up to & including the highest classification levels with gross negligence. Hillary's attitude has always been that the laws apply only to the little people, never to her.This isn't just Republicans mad at her. This isn't just the FBI and the State Department investigating her. This is the Intelligence Community fuming because they have had to abort programs, because they must assume she blew their cover, that the Russians and Chinese have whatever was on her server.And nobody knows how to drop leaks in DC like an aggrieved CIA.</comment>

<comment>The Benghazi Committee is and always was (through its multiple incarnations) an ever-expanding, open-ended circus with one goal and one goal only - nail Hollary Clinton for something, ANYTHING.You dip$#!ts had 11 hours. You spent 4 years and millions of taxpayer dollars. The next bit of actual proof of wrongdoing you get will be the FIRST. You're like a bunch of retards trying to hump a doorknob. You're waiting for the FBI, the CIA or ancient aliens to confirm the famtasies in your head are real.The burden of proof in on YOU. After 4 years (actually, 25 years) of crying wolf, you're the only idiots still listening.</comment>

<comment>You are having reading comprehension problems today, A. The email investigations have nothing to do with Benghazi -- nothing except the fact that it was Trey Goudy of the Benghazi Committee who uncovered Hillary's hidden email server, which she had obviously counted on keeping secret.The pattern of email behavior that is emerging is becoming obvious: Hillary and her gang blew into State like touring royalty. When the State Department said, here are your two government email accounts, one secure and one nonsecure, they were told, Hillary won't be using either of those. She does her own email. State said, But, but, but, how do we send her classified data? how do we archive her work product properly, accordingly to law? They were told: "This is not your concern. Do as we tell you." And that is what they did. Now to their great embarrassment, they realize that Hillary behaved with the grossest negligence wrt handling classified data -- and they enabled her.Have you ever held a Top Secret clearance? I have. Handling of classified data is taken very seriously inside the government. Normals would already be in jail for what Hillary and her aides did.</comment>

<comment>You clearly don't know what you are talking about.</comment>

<comment>Colin Powell and Condi Rice were also careless w/ their emails in a similar way.  This is not to minimize the seriousness of mishandling classified data..I can imagine how you describe things happened as true.  But I also think that part of what we are dealing with is an older generation not fully understanding technology/computers.....I think that includes a lot of people in government.  I think in this case it is ignorance.  Not malice.That, plus the arrogance....the ego and "we know better" attitude, resulting in classified information being in personal email server.....and probably compromising some peoples' safety.And a refusal or inability to simply admit, "I screwed up".. or not taking responsibility for one's actions..I find these qualities common in a lot of people....and not cool.. Especially not public officials.</comment>

<comment>"Colin Powell and Condi Rice were also careless w/ their emails in a similar way."No, no, no. It was similar only in the sense that going 75 in a 65 mph zone is similar to 1st degree murder -- neither is strictly legal. Beyond that, there is no similarity. This is just Clinton lies and obfuscations.Colin Powell and Condi Rice both used personal email accounts (NOT their own servers) on which it is alleged that somebody once sent them something that was Confidential by mistake -- the lowest level of security.This is an administrative mistake at best. It bears NO comparison to having Top Secret/SAP spy satellite data on a unsecured email server & network where hackers can get at it. Remember that we learned about Hillary's private domain name from a Romanian hacker who had hacked Sidney Blumenthal's email."But I also think that part of what we are dealing with is an older generation not fully understanding technology/computers"The easy way out was to let the State Dept. handle the technical issues. It's neither easy nor convenient to maintain your own network & email server. You have to hire an IT guy for that."That, plus the arrogance....the ego and "we know better" attitude, resulting in classified information being in personal email server..."You're getting warmer here. But beyond the arrogance, you have the paranoia. Hillary wanted NOBODY looking over her shoulder (for good reason, as she had no intention of obeying strict Federal conflict-of-interest laws). So she decided she had to have her own email server, so she and only she would have control over all the copies of the email that passed between herself & her staff.Here's the kicker: the State Department has an Inspector General, whose duty is to monitor & investigate compliance with law & policy inside the department. For Hillary's entire tenure as SoS, the office of State Dept Inspector General lay vacant.</comment>

<comment>That's really interesting about the Inspector General....doesn't surprise me.  But is this a direct Clinton request or is it just Federal gov't bumbling?I grew up in DC and so am familiar w/ a lot of the dynamics.  And how powerful appointees or elected officials override protocol...sometimes w/ devastating results (Ron Brown's death for one...the weather was horrible and not safe for flying and the pilot didn't want to take off...Brown "knew better" and they were forced to take off.....Brown was the one who made the decision.)  I think this is just a power dynamic in general, maybe not specific to the political/gov't world.I don't hate the Clintons.  Some of what is said about them is true, but a lot of it isn't or it's a perverted (no pun intended) version of the truth....they have become easy targets and they often don't do themselves any favors.  I "get" Hillary's paranoia but it doesn't serve her.  She's been in the bubble for so long and is surrounded by yes men and women.  I do not automatically believe anything negative said about the Clintons....I look at it skeptically but in some cases there is a reason why they are being called out.Her refusal to acknowledge the appearance of conflict of interest or why people might question a decision she has made has been what has frustrated me.  She may be operating under "everyone else does it but I get nailed so I am going to dig in...I've done nothing wrong."....And I think that in some cases, everyone else is doing it....Washington doesn't really work the ethical way it is supposed to.  That doesn't make it right and logically I would think if "everyone is out to get you" and you are thinking of running for the office of the president that you would act as impeccably as possible and not give bait to those who want to thwart you.</comment>

<comment>All I can say about the State Dept IG is that such a long vacancy was unprecedented. The office was filled under Hillary's predecessors, and it is filled now under SoS Kerry.I read a lot of history about late 18th century Georgian England. The Clintons remind me of the great political Whig families of that time, such as the Duke and Duchess of Devonshire (whose sexual conduct was also scandalous, yet tolerated). The Duke and Duchess knew the laws really were different for them. The Clintons know it every bit as much, which is why they regard all investigations of their crimes as illegitimate.For myself, I wish to resist the creeping idea that our ruling class is an official aristocracy.</comment>

<comment>That's interesting about the vacancy.  It would seem like this would be a person who would be a buffer/help.  But I guess if you are living in a paranoid world you might see it differently.(the paranoia is also an issue to me....I really think I understand it and am empathetic to the reasons for it....but it doesn't have a place for a president)What is interesting to me about the Clintons (vs the Bushes) is that when they came to DC they were outsiders.....and viewed by the snobby DC establishment (not the elected people necessarily but the ones who are here, entrenched in the judicial, legislative and other areas of dark power....the lobbyists, etc....their kids are all in the private schools around the city)....they were considered to be "white trash" just like the Carters were.  And Bill and Hillary were naive and also arrogant, thinking "we're smart (they are smart).  we know how to do this better"...that's sort of how I see how this dysfunction unfolded.  It's a class issue as well as a partisan thing and a power struggle.....and they were totally f*ed by the DC power structure and there has been a battle since.  Only now, the Clintons are part of the financial elite...globally (and maybe outside of DC and in Democratic circles).  There is still a faction in DC that HATES them..........HATES.  Not an understatement.    So, I get the paranoia.  I get that they can't get away w/ the things that other politicians get away with and they are pissed about it.   But you know what? This is reality.  They are wealthy now.  They can quit politics and have a nice life.  But she has chosen to run for office and if you are running for office and under extra special scrutiny, you have to be impeccable in your behavior and appearances of impropriety.  I don't think she has.The other side (their "enemies") are vile.  But that is not an excuse.There are regular normal constituents out here who need a leader who is focused on their needs.  The economy is not so great for a lot of people....</comment>

<comment>She is not under FBI investigation, all you have to do is read. Idiots have been waiting for her to get indicted for 25 years!</comment>

<comment>She is under investigation by BOTH the FBI and the State Department. Double investigation in fact, as both are investigating the issue of mishandling of classified data AND the issue of pay-to-play corruption w.r.t. The Clinton Family Foundation (and Slush Fund).The FBI has reached the stage of subpoenaing Hillary's top aides -- Abedin, Mills, Sullivan. So they are getting close to the end.</comment>

<comment>Yeah, but kissinger is an overrated hack without a moral core, so it makes sense to link him with Hillary. </comment>

<comment>There are still several million dead eligible for "butt hurt" status. Not to mention their families.</comment>

<comment>i know right?....as if Kissingers war crimes and anti-democratic policies are no big deal.</comment>

<comment>You DO realize that by the time Nixon was sworn in and Kissinger approved to be his advisor, the Vietnam War was six years old, millions had already died and there were half a million US troops stationed in Vietnam right?Why do you single out Nixon's advisor for blame for a war started by one Democratic president and greatly expanded by another? Why is an advisor responsible for the decisions of his superiors? Why are you mad about the way Richard Nixon ended someone else's war? Why is a piece of $#!T pseudo-journalist like Cristopher Hitchins still being taken seriously by leftists that Hitchins threw under a bus for the sake of more tv rime on cable news shows?</comment>

<comment>I think Johnson saw what happened to Kennedy for trying to pull out of Vietnam{ and Johnson like hillary was a bollvevil democrat }We now  know Nixon committed treason to get elected by skuttling the peace Johnson negotiated with Vietnam.Do you really call yourself a democrat?</comment>

<comment>Ah, the moral equivalence argument when your guy looks bad. I would say "well played" except that it's not well... played.</comment>

<comment>You are missing the point that it should never have reached this point. She was a high profile government official with clear further political aspirations. Her actions were not missteps but deliberately undertaken efforts to shield her public and private communications from review or scrutiny. She may indeed be the target of a witch hunt but she brought this all down on herself, by herself. Those whom the gods wish to humble they first make proud.</comment>

<comment>You think a democrat should be taking foreign policy advice from Kissinger?.a war criminal,fascist and REPUBLICAN?And her top foreign policy adviser is NEOCON Republican Robert Kagan?“I feel comfortable with her on foreign policy,” Mr. Kagan said, adding that the next step after Mr. Obama’s more realist approach “could theoretically be whatever Hillary brings to the table” if elected president. “If she pursues a policy which we think she will pursue,” he added, “it’s something that might have been called neocon, but clearly her supporters are not going to call it that; they are going to call it something else.”"but clearly her supporters are not going to call it that; they are going to call it something else.”…….got THAT?Her top economic adviser is ?Guess who was that sitting next to Howard Dean { who is now a lobbiest for the healthcare industry ,nuthin to see here }  at the debate?Steve Elmendorf—a Goldman Sachs lobbyist.Yahoo's Michael Isikoff notes Elmendorf is a "key player" in her campaign.Elmendorf runs Subject Matter, "a go-to Democratic lobbying firm for corporate interests, raking more than $10 million in fees last year."Its clients includeGoldman Sachs, Citigroup, Verizon, and Monsanto.and Her other "TOP" economic advisor....Gary Gensler,the former Goldman Sachs partner recruited by Bill Clinton to be undersecretary of the treasury,a key author for the CMFA along with Republican Phil ENRON Gramm.The Clinton record?WalMARTWelfare to workMASS incarcerationNAFTABank de-regualtionAnd now the TPP{ and WORSE}</comment>

<comment>So the GOP drops a Benghazi-flavored stink-bomb, and it's Clinton's fault?Roger Ailes thanks you for being such a useful idiot for him.</comment>

<comment>Thanks for putting words in my mouth.  Note:  I said nothing about Benghazi.I simply think that her penchant for privacy may well come back to bite her in the ass, if the FBI determines that she violated security protocols by setting up a server in her home.  Again, I said "may".  I'm not about to try to guess what the FBI is working with.But whether the Bureau comes up with a recommendation of criminal charges or not, it was not the GOP who set up a server in her basement.  It was not the GOP who deleted 30,000 emails on that server and asked everyone to take her word for it that they were all personal in nature.  No, she has made her own soup, and now she is stewing in it.  The Republicans are in the cafeteria serving line, but the head chef has been Hillary herself.</comment>

<comment>Every day, we get a new leak about the emails. The latest revelation was that not only did Hillary send and receive Top Secret emails on her non-secured, non-governmental email server, they went round to her aides and people working for the Clinton Family Foundation, who were all on her private network.This is not only highly felonious, it is an intelligence leak of potentially catastrophic proportions.Normals go to jail if they try anything like this. This is far worse than what Petraeus was allowed to cop a plea for. He only showed the classified material to his girlfriend, he didn't put it where the Chinese and the Russians could get at it.</comment>

<comment>I agree with you, but some will point out that General P. consciously showed it to a person without clearance (thus the breach is a known fact), whereas HRC merely made breaches possible, and that the fact of any actual breaches remains an unknown.</comment>

<comment>Somebody consciously ported Top Secret/SAP data over the air gap from the secured to the nonsecured system. That act was a felony. Ordering that act, especially if it was a routine occurrence, was also a felony.It should get interesting when the FBI begins to pressure Hillary's aides for testimony in exchange for lessor charges. How confident are they that Obama's DoJ will refuse to convene a grand jury?Remember, it's not just the FBI's rep on the line here. The intelligence community is really, really pissed off about this. In their world, people lose their careers for stuff like this, even at the highest levels, like the CIA head John Deutch, who had to resign when classified material was found on his laptop. (Bill Clinton later pardoned him).</comment>

<comment>Whether the FBI, which (unfortunately) lacks the power to indict, can successfully pressure these lesser persons is both key and dubious.I think Huma will go Susan McDougal to save Hillary. Without her, it'll be tough to take HRC down.</comment>

<comment>The Clinton record?WalMARTWelfare to workMASS incarcerationNAFTABank de-regualtionAnd now the TPPHer 2 top economic advisers work for GOLDMAN SACS....And her top foreign policy adviser is a Republican Neo-con..I bet you dont even know who they are...and she get advice from warcriminal and anti-democratic fascist Kissenger?I bet you dont even know who they are.</comment>

<comment>Walmart employs hundreds of thousands of Americans and provides low cost goods to poor American consumers. Lots of douchebags like to make them the poster child for the decline of the middle class when in fact they're one of best friends poor Americans have.NAFTA is not the job killer anti-free traders claim it is. There's no solid evidence any jobs were lost to Mexico because of NAFTA that weren't already moving to Mexico and haven't already moved to some other low-labor cost country. The US has actually benefitted from NAFTA, as have Canada and Mexico. Tariffs are not the savior of working class Americans any more than border walls.Mass incarceration began long before Clinton and continues long after he left office. When Clinton was in office, the murder and crime rate were double what they are now - a fact ignored by those critical of the 1994 crime bill. In short - the crime bill worked. It passed and crime went down sharply.Franklin Roosevelt had a Republican, Henry Stimson as his secretary of war throughout WWII. What's that about taking advice from evil Republicans again?These and other facts are absent from Bernie Sanders ranters. Simplistic catch phrase bull$#!T similar to the Tea Party has replaced truth and reason. Anti-capitalists have to rely on half truth if not outright lies to maintain their beliefs.</comment>

<comment>LOL!!And your not kidding.Walmart killed mainstreet and pays its employees so little they qualify for foodstamps and government healthcare.FYI....Wal MARt is Unionized is most countries even CHINA.......just NOT the US.Can I re-post this as an example of a Hillary voter?Im sure it would enlighten ALOT of democrats as to what you really are.</comment>

<comment>Believe what you want - but there's a reason Democrats never made any political traction bashing Walmart. Anti-capitalist arguments are always simplistically linear. 'Americans used to make spatulas and microwaves and thanks to Walmart, those products are now made in China.' Never mind these products haven't been made in America in large scale in decades or that cheap imports means more Americans can afford more of these products. US retailers sell Chinese made goods and US manufacturers use Chinese made materials and tools. We benefit and they benefit.Protectionism, price-fixing and tariffs are only good at manipulating markets to pick temporary winners and losers at the expense of others. Free markets are fair and properly regulated and done right, everybody wins. Probably not everybody but more so than under a rigged system of tariffs. The criticisms of Walmart along with NAFTA and the TPP are rooted in the belief that free trade kills jobs, ruins the environment and destroys incomes. It does no such thing. Tariffs and protectionism are not the answer, nor is ripping off consumers (through artificially higher prices) for the sake of government-protected industries.</comment>

<comment>I will repost your comments.These are GOLD and make my point better than I ever could.Even Hillary says NAFTA was a mistake.......only after being SHAMED.FYI........there is nothing "capitalist" about Walmart.Adam Smith would be appalled as would Jefferson....they would consider what Walmart does as TREASON.......no less.They fought a WAR against unfair trade by the East India tea company.what they do is privatize their profits and SOCIALIZE the COSTS and run down wages.Your no democrat.</comment>

<comment>Adam Smith lived in a time of privation, slavery, chaos and tyranny. He would not recognize anything in today's world, nor would he likely have an opinion one way or another about Walmart. He'd probably wonder why one of many retailers was being singled out for harassment when they did what basically every other retailer in America does only on a larger scale.Calling what they do - pay their workers just above minimum wage while selling lots of low price merchandise to every corner of America - treason is absurd. The world would not be a better place without Walmart. Millions of americans would not have a lot of stuff, hundreds of thousands of Americans wouldn't work for this place, and through their supply chains, millions of people around the world would not be employed making things for Walmart to sell.Walmart is part of a lattice work of worldwide industries making use of cheaper, foreign labor to make $#!T. Americans depend on and benefit greatly from internationalism in trade and commerce. Expanded capitalistic enterprise is bringing the world together and making it more stable and peaceful. The US has nothing to fear from free trade and those pitching tariffs, price-fixing, cartelization and strict trade-policing are in fact promoting a system more prone to corruption and behind the scenes manipulation. Give Walmart $#!T for its low wages but quit $#!T-barfing on capitalism and free trade with unfair characterizations and false accusations.</comment>

<comment>So YOU say.But thanks for even more fodder to prove Hillary Democrats arent democrats at ALL!</comment>

<comment>You call that Capitalism?.......LOL!!Socializing the COST and privatizing the profit is CAPITALISM to you?Giving companies tax breaks to leave the US is Capitalism?Bailing out criminal banks is Capitalism?Sending US technology and jobs to slave wage Communist totalitarian countries is Capitalism?And you dont get the connection to your so called "free trade" and widening income and wealth inequality in the US?The U.S. is nearly the most wealth-unequal country in the entire world.GEE ya think it might have something to do with the "Walmartization" of the US?In other countries Walmart is UNIONIZED.....good pay ,not a leech off the state.or Capitalism as YOU call it.You not only dont know what treason is you havent a clue about Capitalism.One wonder what one would have to do do rise to the level of TREASON for you people..its your economic model.FYI.....Even Reaganomics creators have gone against free trade as YOU define it,,..“we have neither capitalism nor democracy. We have crony capitalism.We have crony capitalism, which is the worst.  It's not a free market.  There isn't risk taking in the sense that if you succeed, you keep your rewards, if you fail, you accept the consequences.  Look what happened  the bailout was in 2008.”David StockmanHow the Economy was Lost - Counterpunchwww.counterpunch.org/2009/.../......CounterPunchFeb 24, 2009 - Doomed by the Myths of Free Trade. ... by Paul Craig Roberts. by PAUL ... It is not coming back until free trade myths are buried six feet under.</comment>

<comment>At a debate hosted by CNN in November 2007, Clinton said,"NAFTA was a mistake to the extent that it did not deliver on what we had hoped it would, and that's why I call for a trade timeout."NAFTA not only hurt main-street USA it Hurt Mexican workers and farmers.And the Hillary "gold standard "TPP?WORSE than NAFTA ,now Americans can compeet with literal SLAVES not just slave wages.As for Stimson?.......he was a HAWK....for saving Europe from Nazi's.Kissinger?not just a hawk but War criminal and anti-democratic to boot!Kagan? a NeoCON who was proved WRONG!!not just pushed for war with IRAQ {possibly the most disastrous foreign policy blunder in US history but they want WAR with IRAN...so YOU want to double down on Disaster.....Got it!.....We really do get it!!</comment>

<comment>I think you're flying off the rails in your accusations. Clinton has not promoted the 'gold standard' and as I understand it opposes the TPP. She certainly hasn't called for war with Iran. Your arguments against NAFTA and US trade policy are hyperbolic and silly. Hitchins-esque nonsense about trying Kissinger before the Hague when he helped negotiate normalized relations between the US and China; ridiculous!As a Democrat, I'm AGAINST any Democrat unwilling to listen to what Republicans have to say. Good ideas come from unexpected places and I have no interest in leftist douchebags and conspiracy theorists taking over US foreign policy. I want sound minds and experienced personnel - not just sanctimonious preening about the 2003 vote 'authorizing force.' Did Hillary Clinton invade Iraq? No. Did her vote or support decide whether the war would happen? No. 65% of Americans supported invading Iraq.Clinton's 2003 vote can be looked at as callous or unwise - but consider Bernie Sanders voting against common sense gun legislation in 1994 like background checks and waiting periods because he was in a tough reelection campaign for his house seat which he barely won. Consider Bernie Sanders voting against the bank bailouts as the financial sector collapsed. By a slim margin, a bailout passed and a bank run was avoided. Bernie Sanders publicity stunt vote against the bailouts put our economy in peril at a crucial hour. THAT was irresponsible, reckless and unwise.</comment>

<comment>Ah now come the lies......more GOLD!1.Dont believe ME?........how about Hillary....In Australia in 2012, Clinton delivered remarks on the general topic of the U.S.-Australia relationship. Here’s everything she said about the TPP in that address, with the "gold standard" "This TPP sets the gold standard in trade agreements to open free, transparent, fair trade, the kind of environment that has the rule of law and a level playing field. And when negotiated, this agreement will cover 40 percent of the world's total trade and build in strong protections for workers and the environment."Clinton is saying the TPP does, definitevely set the gold standard -- as opposed to Clinton hoping it will.Just like with NAFTA.....she "changed" her mind when challenged by Bernie......you cant run as a democrat and be for these treasonous trade policies.SHE know that much,why dont YOU?2.Bernie represented VERMONT.....lots of guns and no crime.He did his JOB for his constituents and still gets a D- rating from the NRA....3.On the one hand you say you "endorce" Capitalism as you see it { which isnt capitalism at all} then you say the banks who criminally defrauded the WORLD and belong in JAIL and were supposed to be taken over and broken up by LAW....but they get them some  SOCIALISM?4.And the reason they got so BIG?.......Thank Clinton!!And Hillary's top economic advisor WROTE the the CFMA with Phil Gramm —key legislation that was “one of the main causes of thecollapse in ’08,”And now they are even BIGGER?.....an even larger systemic threat...and Clinton sees no problem with that.you just PROVE you have ZERO principles just like your candidate.</comment>

<comment>What exactly the f@#k is wrong with having a free trade agreement with Australia, Japan, South Korea and other Pacific Rim countries? These are all wealthy, stable democracies with strong alliances both politically and militarily with the US. Why are tariffs necessary? Who are you trying to benefit and why? Who will suffer and what will you do to address that? Explain what exactly you oppose about TPP without resorting to your memorized buzzwords.Free trade is not treasonous. This is a broken record of anti-capitalist nonsense. You're not even willing to consider the fallacy of your accusations and hyperbole. You're basically offering a 700 Club/Family Research Council style devotion to repetitive simplicity. Goldman Sachs! NAFTA! Kissinger! TPP! I guess you can't have a revolution without Bolsheviks.</comment>

<comment>GEE whats wrong with the TPP?........ask Clinton.And what party stood with Obama on the TPP deal?....hint NOT democrats.You dont even know what Capitalism is.You obviously never read either Adam Smith or the founders of this country.FYI.....Ayn Rand was a sociopath not a capitalist is that is who your getting your "economic " ideas from.      “People of the same trade seldom meet together, even for merriment and diversion, but the conversation ends in a conspiracy against the public, or in some contrivance to raise prices.”  ―    Adam Smith,      The Wealth of Nations     "Merchants have no country. The mere spot they stand on does not constitute so strong an attachment as that from which they draw their gains.Thomas Jefferson"I consider the class of artificers [i.e., manufacturers] as the panders of vice  and the instruments by which the liberties of a country are generally overturned."  --Thomas Jefferson to John Jay, 1785. ME 5:94, Papers 8:426  "I hope we shall... crush in its birth the aristocracy of our moneyed  corporations, which dare already to challenge our government to a trial of strength and  bid defiance to the laws of our country." --Thomas Jeffersonbut keep diggin your almost there and you are the best example of a republican and traitor  ,I mean Hillary voter than I could ever ask for!!</comment>

<comment>Nothing?.....You not only dont care about your OWN country you have ZERO problem with "capitalist" by your definition profiting from destroying their country of origin and profiting  from Communist Totalitarian slave wage countries that put their  slave wage workers ,who work 7 days a week 16 hr days in literal GULAGS that have barbed wire around the building so workers dont commit suicide and a government who lets "Captialists" like YOU poison their people.the air ,the water etc....becasue LACK of regulation = MO MONEY!!....all for a BUCK!! Its was alright when you were only destroying the BLACK community because we could always build more Private prison for you to profit from and the white racist you cater to would cheer.But now the WHITE middleclass hasnt seen a wage increase in DECADES ,saw their pensions STOLEN from the "Capitalist" banks,and are watching as their kids become debt slaves for an education and have no decent jobs when they graduate.And as if the millennials dont have enough to worry about they fear they will be the LAST generation on this planet due to man made climate change.TREASON is the least of your "capitalist "crimes.You confuse Capitalism with sociopathy without the self preservation instinct.."The Capitalists will sell us the rope with which we will hang them."Vladimir Lenin</comment>

<comment>1.Dont believe ME?........how about Hillary....In Australia in 2012, Clinton delivered remarks on the general topic of the U.S.-Australia relationship. Here’s everything she said about the TPP in that address, with the "gold standard" "This TPP sets the gold standard in trade agreements to open free, transparent, fair trade, the kind of environment that has the rule of law and a level playing field. And when negotiated, this agreement will cover 40 percent of the world's total trade and build in strong protections for workers and the environment."Clinton is saying the TPP does, definitively set the gold standard -- as opposed to Clinton hoping it will.Just like with NAFTA.....she "changed" her mind when challenged by Bernie......you cant run as a democrat and be for these treasonous trade policies.SHE know that much,why dont YOU?</comment>

<comment>The Republicans will smear Sanders with the billion dollars they have ready. If it is Trump, sane independent voters may prefer Clinton and Republicans may field a third party candidate. A Republican moderate would beat Sanders.</comment>

<comment>I'm not expecting the GOP to nominate a moderate, and I think Clinton has saved the Republicans that billion you speak of, by smearing herself.</comment>

<comment>The money the Republicans have collectively wasted (Ken Starr etc) on the Clintons for 25 years could retire the national debt. Sanders won't know what's hit him if and when they turn that firehouse of vitriol on him. It could happen any day. Just as soon as they are done with their own circular firing squad.Edit firehose </comment>

<comment>Your perspective is reasonable.  Me?  I'm just not keen on electing Nixon-with-a-Vagina.</comment>

<comment>Look Bernie's voters are just protest votes against Hillary, which I get and now I think she does too. In reality, Bernie couldn't enact even one of his proposals in a Republican Congress and everybody knows it. He has no shot at the presidency at all, but probably is making Hillary a better candidate ultimately</comment>

<comment>Agree that this makes her a better candidate.  But my concern is, will it make her a better President?  I suspect not.Hillary is secretive and paranoid.  She's not likely to win the White House and forgive and forget those who opposed her.  More than any other President, she reminds me of Nixon.Whoa, whoa, whoa, before you start telling me, "You can't compare her to Nixon--she's never done anything remotely like what Nixon did!!!  He obstructed justice!  He abused his powers as President"And that's true.But in February of 1968, former Vice-President Nixon had never done anything "remotely" like what President Nixon did, once he got in office.  Hillary's personality is flawed, much like Nixon, who trusted no one.  But unlike Nixon, she had Nixon to learn from.So she wiped her server.</comment>

<comment>"So she wiped her server."If the leaks coming from the FBI are reliable, then no, she didn't wipe the server. She only deleted the emails. The FBI is recovering a lot of material.But the point of learning from Nixon's failure to burn the tapes is a good one.Update: Andrew McCarthy points out that if any of those 30,000 deleted emails were work-related, destroying them was a violation of the embezzlement laws, as they belong to the State Department.http://www.nationalreview.com/...</comment>

<comment>There are no Republican moderates left. Can you name one?I don't think that billion dollars will go to waste if Clinton is the nominee.</comment>

<comment>Kasich is a moderate Republican. Can you name a moderate Democrat?</comment>

<comment>No, sticking the government's nose into women's reproductive choices because of his personal religious beliefs is not moderate. Denying climate change is not moderate.http://www.theguardian.com/us-...As for a moderate Democrat, I don't know. Maybe Martin O'Malley? It's not like I'm a big fan of Democrats. Most of them are just as corrupted by greed as Repubs when it comes to economic and military issues, though they are a little saner on social issues.</comment>

<comment>It is shocking how many people equate different approaches to handling policy as corruption. NOTHING has ever stuck on Hillary because she's never done anything corrupt or illegal - you may disagree with her policies and approaches, but don't spin that into something that just isn't true.</comment>

<comment>she's never done anything corrupt or illegal Never?  Nothing at all?  Sounds like your faith is very strong.And nothing will ever shake the faithful from their beliefs.</comment>

<comment>Zero chance she'll be indicted.  The republicans have been coming up with false stories about her for ages, try not to take a lead from Fox News.</comment>

<comment> The republicans have been coming up with false stories about her for agesSome have certainly done this (e.g., Vince Foster). But the Republicans have had a lot of help from Hillary herself.~ Republicans did not set up the server in her home.~ Republicans did not make her lie about the reason for having such a server (wanting only one device)~ Republicans did not wipe her server when it became clear that it might be subpoenaed.~ Republicans did not force her to say that women who claim to have been sexually mistreated should be believed, nor did they then force her to say otherwise about women who claimed to have been so abused by her husband.I do wonder about one thing, however. During the Whitewater investigation, some records of the Rose Law Firm were subpoenaed, and it was determined that the records were last in the hands of HRC. She said, however, that she could not find those records. After about six months of delay, discussion began about possibly getting a search warrant to look in the White House. Then, lo and behold, the records mysteriously appeared on a table in the private living quarters of the White House. Hillary professed to be absolutely puzzled as to where they had come from.I'll bet they were put there by the Republican butler.</comment>

<comment>For many on the left, Hillary's cozy relationship with Wall Street and other big donors is seen both as a sell-out compromise and as corruption. We're talking about a distinction without a difference.Her vote for the Iraq War does a lot to discredit her claims of superior judgement stemming from experience.So there are plenty of Dems who don't trust her, for a variety of reasons. In fact, I saw one poll that said Democratic voters who considered honesty their #1 concern in choosing a candidate favored Sanders 92% over Clinton's 5%. That's a pretty damning number.In general, Hillary faces the challenge of building a coalition when no one is really excited about her. Her positions and rhetoric are not radical enough to excite the true believers and there just isn't a "Silent Majority" of voters this year looking for a safe, reliable, mainstream candidate. This is just as true for Republicans and Independents as it is for Democrats.</comment>

<comment>Revolutionaries can't get much done within the context of an established, mature democracy.  They are good at gridlock and shutting down government.Not the way forward.</comment>

<comment>Sir, I have the ghosts of Franklin Delano Roosevelt and Fiorello LaGuardia on line one.  They're saying something about systemic change only being possible when people have revolutionary expectations of their politicians.  Would you like me to take a message?</comment>

<comment>When you can get the Democratic-majority Congress that FDR had at his side to pass all the legislation he wanted on the line, then I'll be impressed.</comment>

<comment>I'd suggest that the only chance for that to happen is on the coattails of a Presidential candidate offering transformational change.  FDR didn't inherit a Democratic majority, he put one into office, replacing a Republican Senate and House.</comment>

<comment>Incorrect.  Congress was split, Republicans controlling the Senate and Democrats controlling the House, in the session before FDR was elected.  Please try to get your basic facts correct.</comment>

<comment>"You're not wrong, Walter, you're just an assh*le!"With FDR atop the ticket, the Democrats picked up 97 seats in the House, having already pulled ahead through special elections, on a term that began with a Republican majority.  So it's still pretty reasonable to say that a transformational candidate can bring his or her own Congress.</comment>

<comment>... FDR was an economic conservative. That's why he tried to get rid of the debt accumulated 1936 and why the country reentered a down-period in the economy.  I realize he did great things for the country but I wouldn't say he was as progressive as Teddy or LBJ.</comment>

<comment>Well, you've proven yourself to be both wrong and an assh*le.  Impressive.  But the fault is really mine, because I tried to engage with a lying hypocritical Sanders supporter who is more guilty of the behavior they're claiming the establishment is doing than anyone else.  Your side is the one enforcing mindless compliance, not anyone else.  And all in the service of a phony Democrat, how pathetic.Take your purity tests and shove them where the sun don't shine.</comment>

<comment>And all in the service of a phony Democrat, how pathetic.If voting against the largest foreign policy failure of my lifetime and advocating single-payer health coverage make one a "phony Democrat" in your eyes, then I really have no idea why you'd get so upset by a comparison between Clinton and Humphrey supporters.</comment>

<comment>Well said, get out there and organize and I'll be a bit more impressed.  All my friends sharing Sanders stories did nothing in 2010 and 2014 (a fair number didn't even vote).</comment>

<comment>Yeah, that's just what Ben Franklin, Thomas Jefferson, Aaron Burr, Alexander Hamilton, and G. Washington used to say. No wait..... that's what the CONSERVATIVES who opposed the American Revolution used to say.</comment>

<comment>Ummm... so you are planning on taking up arms against Washington?  Because if not everything he said is still valid.</comment>

<comment>Our political system was designed for gridlock, stop blaming individuals and start dealing with the idea that our founders were not perfect all knowing sages and our constitution is not a holy book.</comment>

<comment>OK.  I started doing that.  What next?</comment>

<comment>Probably just cynicism and frustration, to be honest.</comment>

<comment>I agree.  Getting revolutionaries to join the government is awesome (we have a number of former civil rights protesters in congress), but you need to organize and get involved at a local level and work your way up for true change.  I mean, unless you actually are a revolutionary although those folks in Oregon didn't have much luck.</comment>

<comment>She's lots of things. None of them good.</comment>

<comment>Incrementalism, sustainability, gradual reform; these are tenants of sound government. HRC will build upon the successes of Obama's eight years.Meanwhile, Sanders wants to erase Obama's successes (such as Obamacare), nationalize educational institutions, nationalize banks, nationalize hospitals, release one million prisoners (that one should have garnered some attention!), cancel student debt, raise minimum wage by 100%, and lastly, vastly increase corporate and individual income tax.  --- every single one of Sander's Utopian policies is DOA. But hey, it probably sounds perfectly fine to millennials living in their parent's basements. ;)</comment>

<comment>"Hillary 2016: This Time, Hubert Humphrey Can Win!""Hillary 2016: Caricaturing Democrats Who Support A Different Candidate Is The Surest Path To Victory"</comment>

<comment>So much projection from Sanders supporters these days.  The same people who are making the "not progressive enough" argument are also trying to make the "You're the ones villainizing other Democrats" attack at the same time.Impressively hypocritical, but hypocritical nonetheless.</comment>

<comment>Hey, put your broad brush away, I'm not some collegiate BernieBro.I don't think accurately describing someone's agenda as more moderate than another person's is an insult.  I just believe that running on an agenda that is, at best, equivalent to Obama's is not a recipe for motivating the same base that turned out in '08 and '12.  I also don't think that the constant drumbeat of "Shut up and get in line, kids" is especially productive.  You know who Sanders' best spokespeople have been so far?  Albright and Steinem.And, like almost all Sanders supporters, I fully intend to vote for Clinton when the South and the superdelegates give her the nomination.  In light of that, it's pretty off-putting how the Clinton camp seems to think that supporting a different primary candidate is the same as party disloyalty.</comment>

<comment>' Additionally, voters 18 to 24 were the only age group to show a statistically significant increase in turnout, reaching 49 percent in 2008 compared with 47 percent in 2004. Blacks had the highest turnout rate among 18- to 24-year-old voters -- 55 percent, an 8 percent Increase from 2004. The increased turnout among certain demographic groups was offset by stagnant or decreased turnout among other groups, causing overall 2008 voter turnout to remain statistically unchanged -- at 64 percent -- from 2004."https://www.census.gov/newsroo...It was young black voters who made he difference for Obama together with a fall off in the vote for McCain among independents leaning Republican.</comment>

<comment>It was young black voters who made he difference for Obama together with a fall off in the vote for McCain.From your link: "About 131 million people reported voting in the 2008 U.S. presidential election, an increase of 5 million from 2004, according to a new table package released today by the U.S. Census Bureau. The increase included about 2 million more black voters, 2 million more Hispanic voters and about 600,000 more Asian voters"The "fall off in the vote for McCain" is going to apply in this election as well, since older white men have continued to shrink as a share of the electorate.2 million votes, out of 131 million cast, was not enough to push Obama into office.  It also beggars belief that, in a general election between Sanders and any of Trump, Cruz, Rubio, or Bush that young black people will sit out the general.  I do believe that some older black Americans might, but again, it's hard to see how this would hand the election over to whichever nutter the GOP nominates.It's kind of weird to me how the Hillary camp is using "Sanders won't motivate black people!" as a pro-Clinton argument.  If he were to win the primary - which, as I've stated, is not something this Sanders supporter thinks will happen - then it will be very easy to make the case for a Sanders Presidency's advancement of racial justice over any Republican candidate.Let me say, in all seriousness, that I appreciate you having an argument on this topic using statistics, instead of just sneering at the Democratic youth vote like a lot of Hillary's online supporters.  (And yes, it's just as gross when Bernie's online supporters try and paint Clinton as basically the second coming of Dubya.)</comment>

<comment>I've said nothing about your loyalty, so there's one straw man disposed of.  My comment was about how your message of "It's the establishment that is telling everyone to fall in line" is at odds with the behavior of Sanders supporters, especially ones online.  When Sanders supporters are determining who is and is not progressive, THAT's trying to get people to fall in line.  So spare me the phony indignation, because I'm not making the argument that you're so hysterically railing against.  I don't care who you vote for, but using the "Not my side!" defense for behavior that's coming from both sides isn't going to cut it.Stop being a hypocrite, in other words.</comment>

<comment>Yeah...it's pretty easy to find comments where I am also upset about the conduct of lots of Bernie supporters online, so I could really care less about your considering me a hypocrite on the basis of other peoples' actions.Oh, and has anyone pointed out that joking criticism of your sneering tone turns you into a hostile ass?  You should probably fix that.  When you characterize Sanders' supporters as "living in their parents' basements," you're every bit the sh*thead as a BernieBro assuming you're a Boomer sellout.  You got two polite posts devoid of ad hominem out of me in response to your insulting crap, but as far as I'm concerned, you can kindly f*ck yourself.</comment>

<comment>You have become quite the defensive prick on being challenged about your hypocrisy.  You've even fallen back on the classic Sanders-supporter tactic: making sh*t up.  I never said anything even remotely along the lines of "living in their parents basement."  Maybe you're picking fights with too many people to keep track of who you're blasting aimlessly.  It wouldn't surprise me, given how ignorant you've shown yourself to be.  </comment>

<comment>Sorry, I must have confused you with the OP, in whose defense you decided to jump in and call me a hypocrite.  My bad.  It's almost like it's hard to tell the "Internet Sneerers For Hillary" contingent apart, since you've been preaching the same nonsense since 2008.See, like this tried-and-true projection that Obama supporters were hearing eight years ago, from your second post:When Sanders supporters are determining who is and is not progressive, THAT's trying to get people to fall in line.That would only be true of any Sanders supporters who are telling people to sit out the election if their candidate doesn't win the primary.  I'm sure they're out there, just like I'm sure there are Hillary supporters who will sit this out if Sanders somehow gets the nomination.  And to hell with both of them.But this isn't a general, it's a primary. And, yet again, Clinton and her supporters are personally offended that anyone would run to the left of their candidate.  I'm not telling anyone they shouldn't vote for Clinton, and I'm sure I'll wind up voting for her in November.  I'm just not willing to pretend that she's running to the left of her predecessor, or that a Democrat should be embarrassed to vote for a left-wing candidate when given the rare opportunity.  If this feels like being told to "fall in line" to you, then yeah, it's hard to read that as anything other than your own defensiveness about supporting the right-most candidate in a Democratic primary.</comment>

<comment>I don't think "projection" means what you think it means.</comment>

<comment>Bernie Bros are jerks, so anyone supporting Bernie is not allowed to have an opinion! It's hypocritical to have opinions if jerks agree with you!</comment>

<comment>If you can't beat 'em, straw man 'em</comment>

<comment>Yeah, let's not rush into anything. Let's not actually do anything.Let's just sit back and shrug. Let's just be happy because Chelsea is going to be able to sleep in her old bedroom. So cute!!!</comment>

<comment>So, Clinton is the 'status quo' candidate, running on a platform of "More of the same"?She's definitely the candidate of the Administrative class.</comment>

<comment>I would assume (correct me if I'm wrong) that the million prisoners would be nonviolent drug offenders serving time for dealing weed.</comment>

<comment>A lot of these utopian ideas exist in other countries. I have a hard time viewing Obama as a truly successful president and would not want another 8 years of that standard.</comment>

<comment>Don't people ever get angry at the obvious b*llsh*t that they are being fed?I love that narrative "Hillary decided that the best way to effectuate the changes to the system is to work from within" - goes the narrative.How very convenient for her!  A "campus revolutionary" marries the guy who then becomes the governor of Arkansas -while  she works for the Rose Law Firm with Tyson Foods as a client.Tyson Foods needs preferential treatment from the state of Arkansas where many of their operations are located.  So they set Hillary up with a commodities account and direct her on which trades to make based on inside information - and magically, 1000 dollars becomes 100,000 dollars.Yup, that is "real change" from the "inside" all right.</comment>

<comment>Hillary could strange a puppy on live TV and they would still vote for her.</comment>

<comment>Funny, thats what Trump basically said he could do, and get away with it.</comment>

<comment>The difference is that Trump actually talks about these issues just like we are doing - but Hillary would not acknowledge them even on her death bed.</comment>

<comment>What? This response is in relation to what?</comment>

<comment>Talk is good for his brand. He used to talk liberal talk, then birther talk, and then he made fun of religion--drank a little wine and that little cracker...and quoted the bible...</comment>

<comment>> Don't people ever get angry at the obvious b*llsh*t that they are being fed?You mean like Mexico paying for a wall?  And remember his birtherism in 2012? You're a well fertilized potato, aren't you?</comment>

<comment>Only a pea-brain like yourself would imagine that anybody but you cares who pays for the wall - we only care that it gets built.</comment>

<comment>> Only a pea-brain like yourself would imagine that anybody but you cares who pays for the wallLOL, a lib caring about fiscal responsibility. It must be opposite day or something. Better a pea than a molecule or two, I guess.>  we only care that it gets built.Um, dummy, a wall would actually be bad right now. Illegal immigrants are actually returning, so why would we want to impede that?  Oh, and we can do things like make the people who hire them responsible, but people like Donald wouldn't want such a thing like that, now would they? Even if Trump never ever hired an illegal (until proven otherwise, we'll say he never did hire an illegal), do you see how solutions like this never come up from them?</comment>

<comment>If you honestly think a friggin' wall across the whole Mexican border is anything other than pure insane fantasy, you're too dumb to be allowed. America will build a bullet train to Mars before it builds a Great Wall of China on the Mexican border.</comment>

<comment>There's already a border fence, numbskull - it can be enhanced. Stick your finger in a wall socket.</comment>

<comment>They all said we would never build this wall, but we said "Yes we can!"</comment>

<comment>Who is buried in the concrete at Trump Plaza that was provided by one of Trump's mob boss friends? Will Trump's "university" scam ever pay back its fraudulently obtained fees to the hapless Trumpettes it snookered?A billionaire "outsider" is candidate for the easily duped--those Trump calls 'losers'. </comment>

<comment>I'm still angry over the lies told about why the US should invade Iraq. Nothing Clinton has done has had that kind of drastic effect on this country (and I'm speaking as someone who does not like Clinton). I'm still angry about the lies of trickle-down economics.</comment>

<comment>The lies were told by Bush Cheney, Tenet..</comment>

<comment>"Saddam is dangerous. The world would be a better place without him. But the reason he poses a growing danger to the United States and its allies is that he possesses chemical and biological weapons and is seeking, with his $2 billion a year illegally skimmed from the U.N. fund for food, his Oil for Food program, for peace program, that he is seeking nuclear weapons."/i>--Joe Biden, October 10, 2002</comment>

<comment>In the lead photo she appears to be telling a fishing story.</comment>

<comment>"This is how much money I was paid for my last speech."</comment>

<comment>Or, "When we landed in Bosnia, under fire, later we went fishing and I caught..."</comment>

<comment>Sanders has been in government for a very long time and he has not accomplished much. I'm not even sure how he can be called an outsider.</comment>

<comment>The country elected a radical/revolutionary in 1980 - remember the "Reagan Revolution"?  That administration drastically cut taxes (which nearly tripled the national debt), significantly increased military spending, and limited regulatory agencies.  We've been incrementally moving right ever since.  Citizens are still looking for a correction to that radical change.</comment>

<comment>Ah, that's why you want a return to Jimmy Carter (and George McGovern)!</comment>

<comment>I can't tell if your point is that you prefer Republican Presidents or that the two guys you mentioned lost elections and Sanders would do the same.  Maybe you should try writing clearly.</comment>

<comment>You have no idea what a McGovern presidency would've been like.Also, it's funny how you cons despise McGovern and Carter, two men who are head and shoulders above most con politicians. They both spent their post-politics lives working to end hunger and disease. They both also served in the armed forces (McGovern in bomber squads during WWII), unlike nearly every con candidate.</comment>

<comment>and both lost by large margins (hence the reference to the "Reagan revolution") The Dems didn't get back into the White House until Clinton ran as a "new," conservative Democrat. That would be the same Clinton group that is now telling you they represent the McGovern/Carter/Mondale wing of the party.</comment>

<comment>McGovern didn't run as a War Hero, hmm?His supporters probably didn't even know he was a bombardier.</comment>

<comment>Tip O'Neil had more than a little to do with the Debt from those budgets.</comment>

<comment>So the significant increase in defense spending was his idea, huh?  He's was the one who proposed the large tax cuts?</comment>

<comment>Tip promised Spending cuts.That didn't happen.So there were tax reforms (that were needed) and spending increases on both Guns and Butter.</comment>

<comment>I have to say - this is probably the best attempt I've read to try and spin Clinton's past corruption and greed as some sort of pragmatism.</comment>

<comment>Martin Shkreli was working inside the system to improve the pharmaceutical industry.Bernie Madoff could so more as an insider to fix hedge funds than he could as a critic.Hillary Clinton worked with Tyson Foods to fix commodities trading.  Then she worked with the Saudis and the Clinton Foundation to fix our political system.And her speeches to Goldman Sachs have fixed Wall Street from the inside.</comment>

<comment>Oh come on now, I have a lot of friends in the tech business and they (and I) have helped build websites for some multi-national corporations that I don't think are good.  We are all progressive and I don't think you can honestly say that you and any progressive friend you know have never worked for a corporation.</comment>

<comment>Sounds like you are replying to the wrong post. I was lampooning HRC's meme of "working inside the system to achieve change".I know what HRC has been doing because I read the newspapers.  I have no idea what you are doing, since you are not famous.Whether or not  your particular job or the company you work for happens to be consistent with your particular set of principles is nothing that anybody here can evaluate.</comment>

<comment>I'd have more faith in the Democratic establishment if they could get voters to the polls in midterms.   I'd have more faith in the Democratic establishment if they didn't trade more competitive seats for fewer safe ones.  I'd have more faith in the Democratic establishment if they didn't vote for Omnibus bills that have whorish, 11th-hour, corporate-sponsored riders in them.    The only reason that Republicans add those riders to Omnibus bills is to get Democratic fingerprints on them.The Democratic party is long over due for a little self reflection.  Sanders has been instrumental in this regard.</comment>

<comment>I'd have more faith in my progressive friends if they would give a darn in the midterms.  I noticed that most of them did the bare minimum (vote) in 2010 and 2014 while I actually tried to do something.  Forgive me for being skeptical, but we do live in a country that reelected Bush in 2004 and which has currently given both the House and the Senate to republicans.  Self-reflection is always fine, but please make sure you don't reflect so much that we end up with another 8 years of someone worse than Bush.</comment>

<comment>OWS was in fact a moment. BLM morphed into an incrementalist policy oriented local politics movement, which is very much in line with what Clinton advised in the impromptu meeting with activists at one of her campaign speeches.For example: http://www.joincampaignzero.or...</comment>

<comment>All you need to know about Hillary and her level of ambition is the fact that when she decided she needed to be a Senator, she chose to run in New York, where she was almost certain to win, rather than her home state of Arkansas, where she would have had a much tougher race.</comment>

<comment>How is that a negative? Many Dems and GOP leaders have moved to different States.</comment>

<comment>Which current U.S. Senators moved to the states they represent for the purpose of becoming Senators?</comment>

<comment>Sanders</comment>

<comment>Bernie Sanders chose to move to lily-white Vermont to begin his career, after he took part in the "white flight" out of NYC in the 70s as it was becoming more diverse.  Why didn't Bernie want to run in a city where minority voters were increasing?  Keep that in mind before you start tossing "carpetbagger" claims around.</comment>

<comment>To be accurate- Arkansas was not her home state either.</comment>

<comment>Radicalism always ends in failure. What did Occupy Wall Street accomplish? Nothing. What has Black Lives Matter accomplished so far? Nothing. What did all those 60's radical movements accomplish? A right wing backlash and the Reagan era. What did Ralph Nader's 2000 campaign accomplish? 8 years of George W Bush, the invasion of Iraq and a financial sector meltdown.By contrast, incremental neo-liberalism brought the strong 1990's economy and the temporary reversal of what has now been 35 years of absurdly high deficits and ever-growing debt. Incrementalism got us the first comprehensive healthcare reform bill basically ever. Where this country would be without the steady centrist leadership of Clinton and Obama is hard to fathom. For the alternative to Clinton/Obama is an increaingly irate and incompetent right wing driving this country into the ground. "Principled progressives" are losers happy with losing. Losing is all they know how to do so they've made it a virtue.</comment>

<comment>There used to be slavery. I could go on about child labor, 12 hour days, but so what , right?</comment>

<comment>Was any of the progress on those issues attributed to radicals? The Civil War and some constitutional amendments ended slavery, not Jim Brown. Further, a 'radical' opposing slavery and chold labor is hardly comparable to a 'radical' who wants free healthcare and forgiveness of his student loans.</comment>

<comment>I agree that in the current circumstances incrementalism is the way to go. I think Sanders thinks that the current situation is a crisis similar to that of 1932 which it isn't in so far as it is the accumulated slow decline that is prompting it. The financial crisis of 2008 has been undone but without a new bubble to reflate the economy. And simultaneous stagnation in all the worlds economies means no external pull for the US.I also think Sanders is reliving the 1968 new left era which formed his political outlook and imagining that this time it can work. I doubt that. The motive for white grass roots activism was feminism and the anti-draft movement. Free tuition just doesn't have the same force, as you say.  Nor does legal pot which doesn't have a left bias.</comment>

<comment>When you have the Presidency incrementalism is always the way to go. If there is a catastrophe this year, economic or international, the conservative radicalism (opposing political force) will automatically have the upper hand.</comment>

<comment>I think there are parts of the oligarchy that would oppose radicals on the right among the oligarchy itself and outside it. It is up to the moderate left and the left to be part of such a coalition if necessary, just as in the 1930"s.</comment>

<comment>First, Jim Brown was a fullback for he Cleveland Browns and John Brown was an abolitionist who attacked the system and ended up swinging from a rope.Second, John Brown, who can definitely be faulted for his methods and planning, was just one of the agitators who incited the Civil War, which now seems like the inevitable path to ending slavery. If we were relying on the abolitionist societies to convince the South to abandon slavery, we would still have it today. It's not for nothing that Union soldiers sang "John Brown's Body."Hopefully, we don't need a Civil War, but as MW points out, systems fight change. And incremental change is fine within a system. But getting money out of politics will take a direct assault. Incremental won't do it.</comment>

<comment>In my opinion, it will take an alliance with part of the oligarchy to hold on to democratic institutions and extend gains made. The Democratic party has always been a broker between the majority and the majority of the oligarchy, using the countervailing power of numbers, unions and other civic organizations against the direct power of money and intimidation. That is the reality of oligarchy when it has the upper hand, as it does.</comment>

<comment>But what gains made? Ordinary people in the US have done nothing but lose ground since 1980.</comment>

<comment>The Civil War started the second Abraham Lincoln won the 1860 election. It started because South Carolina wanted to start it and convinced the South to secede. John Brown or no John Brown (or Jim Brown for that matter), the Civil War was coming the moment the Northern states decided to stop placating Southern dedication to slavery.Its telling that when looking for examples of succesful radicalism, you turn to 1860 and a war in which 600,000 Americans died. Radicalism works when nothing else will and when by 'works' you mean you're ready for war. Are you ready for a civil war over free college tuition?</comment>

<comment>Hey. I was just going with the conversation. This is what happens when a thread plays out. One person says that radicalism ends in failure. Another responds that radicalism ended slavery, followed by the response that John Brown did not end slavery, which led to my response.I doubt that anyone on this thread is comparing our current situation to that of the country on the brink of actual civil war.</comment>

<comment>Point taken. I was the guy who started by saying Jim Brown went back in time to fight slavery after his football career but came back in time to star in I'm Gonna Git You Sucka.</comment>

<comment>Time to tell myself to read more carefully.</comment>

<comment>No, but I'm ready for a civil war to break the grip of the 1%.Do you really think this is just about free stuff? You're too smart for that.By the way, European nations in which ordinary citizens are happier and more prosperous than ordinary citizens in the US had to fight civil wars to break the power of the 1%. We've never had such a war, so maybe we're due one.http://www.commondreams.org/vi...</comment>

<comment>Why is an idea radical if it is the norm in most developed countries?</comment>

<comment>I disagree strongly. Shit, if it weren't for the radicals we'd still believe the Earth was flat. Enlightenment takes time, son.</comment>

<comment>Strategically, you are dead wrong.</comment>

<comment>If only there was a recent election we could point to where, against the advice of pundits and party elders, the Democrats nominated a candidate to the left of Hillary Clinton and still managed, somehow, to win in the general on the strength of young voters.</comment>

<comment>Behind every revolution is a counter-revolution. Behind every 'radical' leftist movement is a right wing backlash. Radicals ALWAYS defeat themselves. Incrementalists almost always win. Thats the difference between the two.</comment>

<comment>So the Civil Rights movement was doomed from the start?</comment>

<comment>Perhaps look at a wider scope of world history.</comment>

<comment>In the US over the past 30 years, the right wing has been incrementalist while the left wing has stood idly by, doing nothing. Our incremental changes have produces a militarized, imperial nation on the verge of open corporate fascism.</comment>

<comment>Radicalism always ends in failure. Yeah, I remember reading about how the party elders' installation of Humphrey in '68 helped the Democrats continue the progressive policies of the Johnson administration, and how the Roosevelt nomination put Hoover in office in '32.  I mean, a candidate articulating clear and radical progressive solutions to an economy that had failed working Americans in the face of a Republican Senate and Congress?  What a maroon!Besides, it's not like we're in the same situation as we were after the Crash.  Back then, things were so bad for working Americans that nearly a fifth of them supported outright fascism.  Can you imagine seeing something like that in this day and age?  Impossible!Alright, enough kidding.  I'll be voting for Hillary come November, even though it will teach the Democratic Party leadership that "sh*t all over the kids who swept Obama into office" is a winning formula.  The Supreme Court is too important to sit this out as a nominee protest.</comment>

<comment>Ronald Reagan was a radical, the other side loves radicals. You've been given weak tea and convinced you will be slapped if you ask for better.</comment>

<comment>I can understand the ignorant conservative voter would vote for a shiny city on a hill, then get screwed  by their "establishment" with tax cuts for the rich, and blame the ensuing catastrophe on liberals.But why liberals would need the same "vision" of single payer just to see it go on the shelf on DAY ONE? Then they turn away from their leader in disappointment and sit at home at midterms.  Haven't we seen this movie before???Democracy works in small steps, radicalism may happen at 25% unemployment, or with some catastrophic event, and in 2016 situation (with Democratic President) the beneficiary would be conservatives. Don't we want our leaders to tell as it is? Don't BS us with any shiny city or tax cuts or single payer! Single payer may happen some day, but most likely evolutionary through public option first. Wouldn't it be a wise course of action to consolidate the gains (which, mind you, still could be reversed) rather than go for a moonshot, lose presidency, and lose all the gains????</comment>

<comment>When has radicalism ever accomplished anything?</comment>

<comment>I meant it in more general terms as radicalism/revolution, similar to what FDR has had.</comment>

<comment>Ummm, the French Revolution? Does the American Revolution fall into the category of radical? If not, why?</comment>

<comment>The founding fathers were radical.</comment>

<comment>The issue isn't radicalism vs. incrementalism. The issue is that it's a lie that we've been making incremental gains. The only thing our incrementalism has brought us is a declining standard of life, as the middle class becomes working class, and the working class slides into welfare dependence and poverty.</comment>

<comment>We have been losing gains since the Carter years, thanks to the perfidy of Democratic politicians, who discovered it was better to take money from the rich and give the rest of us the finger. Nobody ever got rich by standing up for the little guy.</comment>

<comment>The only one who seems to think Black Lives Matter is anything other than a complete disaster (or much worse) is Beinart.  OWS did not accomplish anything, and has basically morphed into BLM.   Can anyone point to one single thing either accomplished?  Both have stood in the way of progress, clearly.</comment>

<comment>Certainly I can mention something that OWS accomplished -- it destroyed the taboo surrounding the term "economic inequality." Until OWS came on the scene, no mainstream economist would even admit that inequality had grown over the previous three decades.As for BLM, it has accomplished putting police brutality in the spotlight. There was the same amount of police brutality before 2014, but there was a complete silence about the issue. To most Americans, police brutality was something Mubarak's thugs did to Egyptians.</comment>

<comment>I notice Beinart omitted to mention HRC's senior thesis on Alinsky, the letters she letters she exchanged with him, the job he offered her. A more honest journo would at least have tackled the subject. But that is not Beinart's way. He prefers to sweep inconvenient facts under the rug.</comment>

<comment>I'm sorry, but wouldn't that be "her senior thesis," mentioned about half-way through?</comment>

<comment>Beinart may have mentioned the existence of Hillary's senior thesis but he deliberately failed to mention its subject -- Saul Alinsky -- and mischaracterized its theme by insinuating that Hillary was in some way working against the radical left. Not at all. Like any good student of Rules for Radicals, she was a member of the radical left; she just wanted to find strategies and tactics that worked to subvert the system and achieve her radical goals.</comment>

<comment>Fellow Democrats.....it really isn't about a Democrat in the White House managing to accomplish much of anything.It's about a Democrat in the White House preventing a Republican President and Congress from destroying our country.Think of the horrors that could happen to the Supreme Court.I'm almost as concerned with Justice Ginsburg's health as my own.HRC might be able to accomplish a little around the edges.Maybe squeeze some court appointments through. That's not insignificant.But mainly the most we can hope for is a holding action until demographic changes kick in and sanity has a chance of prevailing.Maybe, just maybe, reapportionment following the 2020 census could break the Republican hold on the House.Sanders is a fine man. More decent and honest than most politicians. It seems this moral uprightness extends to his personal life, too. HRC has made more deals, some rather sordid, and isn't remotely as pure as the driven snow. She plays hardball.Any Democrat is preferable to any Republican. Period. Policy is much more important than any individual candidate.Let's nominate the person who is, as far as we can best evaluate, more electable.Her gender certainly shouldn't be determinative, but it is time for a woman, and, despite some genuine character issues, she is superbly qualified.</comment>

<comment>She plays hardball.=========That's why she's the right person for the White House at a time like this.</comment>

<comment>She plays hardball in the service of very incremental goals.Give me someone who has really inspiring goals, who also fights like hell and knows how to strategize and organize to serve that goal. It isn't clear that Sanders is that guy, but I'm willing to give him some time before settling for Hillary.</comment>

<comment>Hardball for the benefit of Wall Street</comment>

<comment>Silly smear.</comment>

<comment>Way to set your sights low there, homey.ETA: Do you really think, given the fact that Republicans hold power in so many statehouses, that the reapportionment in 2020 is going to go the Dem's way? I'm doubtful.This is not all to say that I think Sanders can deliver on what he proposes. To the contrary, I think he can't without a very well thought out, and well executed, plan. (There's an article here in The Atlantic on that very subject, by Eric Liu I believe.) I am willing to give Sanders time to work on that part. In the meantime, I'll support him because Hillary is *defninitely* not the one to fight a war of the type needed to win more fairness in American society.</comment>

<comment>This comment is awaiting moderation. Show comment.</comment>

<comment>Can you think of a revolution where those in power said "This idea's time has come. Let's enlist and push for change!"</comment>

<comment>Revolutions can easily go off the rails (see the Middle East). In America, a failed revolution would look like a "socialist" president yelling at a militant, obstructionist congress in the best case, President Donald Trump picking Supreme Court Justices in the worst case. Those aren't acceptable risks.</comment>

<comment>You're not getting it. Revolutions actually take years, sometimes decades to finally reach critical mass. Before FDR came on the scene, workers had been rioting and demanding better conditions since the 1890s. America's own independence revolution did not really begin in 1774. That's just when things went kaboom. There had been unrest for quite some time. All the British abuses took time to sink and become angry grievances.Sanders himself will not actually lead a revolution, but he could plant the seeds. Let's say he wins and becomes a completely ineffective president because of an obstructionist congress. After him, since the rich won't stop squeezing us, someone even more radical will emerge, and by then, more Americans will be doing poorly and be ready, even eager, to hear the "radical" message that our economy should work for everyone and not just for a small elite group of self-dealing people.But it has to start somewhere, and Hillary is not the start of anything -- she is status quo 100%.</comment>

<comment>Sanders did not surpass Obama's turnout in NH in 2008. If he doesn't do that again in SC, there is no revolution, period!</comment>

<comment>Sanders isn't a revolutionary either - he's running for president, not remaking the system. He still depends on a friendly Congress - which it doesn't look like he'll have.</comment>

<comment>You must love the job Debbie Wasserman Schultz is doing for you guys.  She confirmed that superdelegates exist for "consummate insiders" like Hillary.  Asked by Jake Tapper if superdelegates amount to "rigging the system," she outright confirmed that that's exactly the point: "Unpledged delegates exist really to make sure that party leaders and elected officials don't have to be in a position where they are running against grass-roots activists."  https://www.washingtonpost.com...I think the same can be said of her decision to revoke the rules against lobbyists and PACs donating to the DNC, a measure put in place by Obama.  https://www.washingtonpost.com...If you can't beat'em, create "Change the Record."  Then, if you still can beat'em, just "Change the Rules."</comment>

<comment>The super delegate system has been around for a long time. But all of a sudden, its time to blow it all up so a radical candidate can steal the nomination? Ah....no thanks. Hillary learned her lessons from previous elections and locked up the delegates necessary to win. That's called experience and it counts. Bernie's lack of delegate support just proves that his campaign built on emotion is the wrong way to go.</comment>

<comment>So if Hillary loses the popular vote in the primaries, but wins the nomination anyway, you'll be cool with that?</comment>

<comment>She won't lose the popular vote. You're buying into the week and a half of all out Bernie fluffing that was always coming after New Hampshire. He's heading into hostile territory from here on out so his campaign has to make as much political hay as possible right now. Nevada will end this Sanders fluff period.</comment>

<comment>Them's the rules. I won't like it either, but it would be worse to change the rules in the middle of the race.</comment>

<comment>Just spent a minute over on a Salon comment board and you would think there was a Hugo Chavez convention taking place.</comment>

<comment>With such a flawed candidate as Clinton, we should be worried.Former Obama intel official: Hillary Clinton should drop outhttp://edition.cnn.com/2016/02...</comment>

<comment>Please. Have you seen this guy's vita?  He's a nut.</comment>

<comment>Keep telling yourself that, Gruber.</comment>

<comment>Sanders is basically the inevitable reaction on the left to the Tea Party. Both are built on self sustaining outrage, extremist talking points and radicalism.</comment>

<comment>And wasn't the Tea Party pretty successful in pushing the Republicans to the far right?</comment>

<comment>Obviously not, or the GOP base wouldn't be staging a Trump revolt this time around, but would be backing a GOP Establishment candidate instead.</comment>

<comment>Just as the Tea Party was the inevitable reaction on the right to Obama, and his radical expansion of Federal spending and power.</comment>

<comment>If Bernie Sanders is channeling Eugene McCarthy, running against a relative of a former  president/cabinet member who moved to New York to run for the Senate, who will fill the role of Sirhan Sirhan?</comment>

<comment>not_guilty: If Bernie Sanders is channeling Eugene McCarthy, running against a relative of a former president/cabinet member who moved to New York to run for the Senate, who will fill the role of Sirhan Sirhan?I'm not sure I've ever seen you before, sir, but I've seen enough to know that you're a real @sshole.</comment>

<comment>Hey, Hillary "RFK was assassinated in June" Clinton would understand.</comment>

<comment>Hillary was full-on Rubio Robot in yesterday's debate. I guess it hasn't escaped anybody's attention that South Carolina Democrats are mostly Black.So Hillary set some kind of Guinness Book Record mentioning Obama something like 31 times and 'African-American' some similar amount.'Question:  Mrs. Clinton- what kind of underarm deodorant do you use?""Hillary: President Obama was very successful with Irish Spring, the manly deodorant - and I intend to consult with the African-American community to find a deodorant which will have the best impact on their neglected neighborhood drugstores".</comment>

<comment>You cannot compare Hillary's performance to Rubio's gaffe.  She was only doing what Rubio and all the other debaters try to do--stay on message.  What Rubio did was not to stay on message, it was getting stuck in a feedback loop.  It was strange and unsettling and I'm not sure he'll ever recover from it.  And I mean, I don't know if he'll have a chance in 2020 or 2024, let alone 2016.</comment>

<comment>What Rubio did was pathetic - and no different from what HRC was doing. Sounds like you want to spin here a bit for Team Hillary.</comment>

<comment>No, you just don't realize that for Rubio,  it was near a Dean Scream.Hill's 'performance' was nowhere near as bad</comment>

<comment> Sounds like you want to spin here a bit for Team Hillary.That is amusing. You need to read more of my stuff. No one hates that woman more than I do. She is the single-most dishonest candidate for President since Nixon, and I resent her selfish quest for power, which will possibly result in my having to vote for the single-most unqualified candidate in my lifetime, Donald Trump.Your confusion might be the result of the fact that most Hillary haters are incapable of making an objective observation about Herself. Well, that's not me. I've been watching politics for about 50 years, and I've never seen anything on a national stage like what Rubio did. I like him, but I suspect he's toast now. And its a damn shame, because he would have been the best shot at crushing HRC in the general election.</comment>

<comment>"...She is the single-most dishonest candidate for President since NixonBill Clinton...".Fixed that for you.</comment>

<comment>Don't follow you. I certainly think, as hard as it is to separate "Billary", that she's at least as dishonest as her husband, and possibly more so. My point is that she's the most dishonest candidate in a half-century. That covers what you say, and then a whole lot more.The only way your "fix" works is if you think she's not as dishonest as Bill.</comment>

<comment>In a twist of poetic irony, Hillary and the democratE finally understand what it's like to be up against far left kooks with their plans and agendas that are nothing more than pipedreams..</comment>

<comment>Hillary has been around forever and some have always hated her. Blamed her for the misdeeds of her husband which was totally unfair. Hillary is not alone in standing by her man. Whether it was the right thing to do was entirely Hillary's decision and not for anyone else to decide for her. To this day those episodes of long long ago still follow her because it's good political fodder for her opponents. Insider, outsider makes no difference we just want someone who knows what they are doing when in the White House on day one. Right now the only person for that role as I see it is Hillary.</comment>

<comment>But will Hillary promote ideas that benefit you or that harm you?</comment>

<comment>As a woman her ideas will benefit me and millions of women out there. Our rights are being stripped away by Republicans every day. They don't want anyone to get more than the measly minimum wage they are getting now. Don't want women to get paid the same as men for the same job and the list goes on.  Any woman who votes Republican either doesn't know what they are up to as regards women's rights or being lied to.</comment>

<comment>Clinton will not do a goddamn thing for ordinary women. At best, she won't make things worse, but that's all you can expect from her.</comment>

<comment>Make things worse. I don't think so. Things would be 100 times worse under any Republican. They are a woman's worst nightmare.</comment>

<comment>Seems that the word "compromise" has become a dirty word on the fringe, Sanders left. Funny how that's the same thing the Tea Party believes.</comment>

<comment>"Compromise" is a con job sold to us as an unmitigated good. It's not, especially not as practiced in US politics. Over the last 30 years, compromise in US politics has meant liberals agreeing to conservative plans that are toned down just a little. That little toning-down is all liberals have gotten for their compromises.</comment>

<comment>Seems that the word "left" has become a dirty word to the entitled Clinton centrists.  Funny how that's the same thing every Republican believes.</comment>

<comment>Hillary despised the left because she envied the sincerity of their convictions and their heartfelt depth,  personal qualities she is incapable of. I remember the era because I was a college lefty myself. The place was full of hillaresque compromisers and phonies, opportunists. Had she really been against the war then,  Libya would not have happened. She's a warmonger</comment>

<comment>I think she is pretty darn sincere in her principles... she has been articulating them for decades.  She's also a bit more interventionist I would like but then I think Bernie is a bit too focused on big ideas instead of execution for what I would like.</comment>

<comment>I was one of the radicals wanting change... just in 2004.  I have to say that choosing between Obama and Bush I am pretty darn happy with Obama.  I supported Clinton in 2008 over Obama because I thought Obama's idealism was naive (he has definitely come around to my point of view).  I think this is naivety again.  Believing in change is great... but this is a country that reelected Bush.  My friends argue that you cannot change things if you do not try to get everything you want, I argue that Bush was terrible and Obama at the very least didn't do as much harm (and I think he will be remembered as a fairly progressive president).</comment>

<comment>Obama's idealism was a sham. Obama is a machine politician and always has been. He is a real believer in the unlimited power of the machine, however, and has been steadily expanding the size and power of the unaccountable Federal administrative machine ever since he got to Washington.Of all Obama's various complaints, the only one I have sympathy for is his complaint that the Left has failed to appreciate how much he has done for them. It's a lot. It just isn't visible on the surface.</comment>

<comment>Hillary is also a profoundly incompetent insider.Her healthcare gambit crashed noisily largely because her approach bore a startling resemblance to the people/political skills currently exhibited by Ted Cruz.And her plan was the same kind of Rube Goldberg apparatus as the ACA.Basically, taxpayers get soaked to solve the society's inability to create a national healthcare system.Her tenure in State is distinguished by the disastrous Libyan fiasco. Of course, the GOP is asking all the wrong questions. When she or her boss are asked about that, they proudly state that they "prevented another Syria."You can't make this stuff up.At her  core, she's still that arrogant entitled, self-absorbed college student who attached herself to a successful politician and who's done slimy deals since the early Arkansas days.https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/...Now, Hillary -- with the help of global con artists like George Soros, is set to crush Bernie Sanders wtth the old reliable Pile of Money blitz.https://www.washingtonpost.com...Once the Americans get this lesson in how their "democracy" works, an important step will have been taken. That lesson is: you have exactly the same democratic options as the residents of Hong Kong.Given that, you might as well opt for the benefits of a socialist state.</comment>

<comment>When one perceives oneself and one's peers as safe, then change is generally seen as undermining that safety and such change as needed should be tailored to maintain that sense of safety. Of such is Hillary Clinton. When one however sees oneself and peers as less-than-safe, unsafe, or even in danger, then change is seen as essential, transformational, even real safety. Of such is Bernie Sanders.People in this country don't feel safe, and life seems precarious. Clinton's political economy is to address that fear by handing over the rest of the country to those whose greed, stupidity, and arrogance created this climate of fear, and safety will be only available to those who can afford the price.I'm with the zombies on this one.</comment>

<comment>Hillary is a consummate liar, cheater and thief - not to mention an unindicted felon. The only drapes should be measuring are those of her waiting jail cell.</comment>

<comment>And, Bernie wears Depends, Trump is a little Hitler and Cruz makes Nixon look like a Boy Scout. Isn't trolling nonsense fun?</comment>

<comment>Despite your ignorant garbage - Hillary is still a liar.</comment>

<comment>There should be more discussion of the way the DNC has rigged the election for Hillary with their super-delegate racket.Bernie got robbed in Iowa http://dailycaller.com/2016/02...and shafted in NH with Hillary getting the same number of delegates - there's just no justification for this. Just look at the huge Hillary superdelegate distribution by statehttp://www.bloomberg.com/polit...Note that the larger the state the larger the Hillary superdelegates so thateven if Bernie wins in a state by votes anywhere near Hillary's (likely) he loses after the superdelegates (including Bill in NY) are injected. And forget the BS about, well, the superdelegates can switch. Sure, we should have to depend on that? Look at the listhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/...A bunch of more equal party elites - would Bill Clinton switch?  Why must there be superdelegates at all, besides as insurance against Bernie? The pro-Hillary Democratic Party elites are not leaving it to democracy to win. It's rigged and its rotten.</comment>

<comment>Her next stint will be as a prison insider.</comment>

<comment>“They want radical. It’s what they came for”============Given the makeup and political climate in Washington, a radical will get absolutely nothing done whatsoever. That's what the Left Wing Tea Party can't understand. To enact an agenda, the president will need to get some Republicans on board. Bernie has zero chance of that yelling angry slogans.</comment>

<comment>Obama's limitation was not so much his incrementalism, its that fact that Republicans won the House in 2010 and put an end to what he could accomplish legislatively. Using the powers of the presidency he has accomplished a lot in a progressive direction, arguably as much as anyone, including a President Sanders could have.The "realism" progressives supporting Bernie need to face isn't about Clinton or Sanders per se, its about Congress and the Supreme Court. Those institutions are where the blocks to progress are right now. Not in the White House.w</comment>

<comment>Concerning Bernie's ability to get something done: In his 25 years in Congress, Bernie was the primary sponsor of 3 passed bills and 2 of those each renamed a Vermont post office.  Please tell me how Bernie is going to get anything passed in a Republican-controlled Congress.  He is a passionate advocate whose commitment to his causes is to be admired.  But he is no dealmaker who can get things done.  For all her faults, Clinton has a record of getting things done.  I'll take realistic incrementalism any day over pipe dreams that don't stand a chance.Concerning his electability: Last year, Gallup ran a poll that asked respondents to identify a characteristic in a candidate that would prevent them from supporting that candidate.  According to Gallup, by far the most objectionable characteristic was being a socialist.  Fifty percent of those polled would not vote for a socialist. Republicans will trumpet Bernie's standing as a socialist far and wide.  How can Bernie win a general election when he begins his national campaign with half of the electorate opposing him? And especially when they run videos of Bernie praising Castro (one is already available on youtube), his conscientious objector status, and his past relationships with Manual Ortega and a number of political figures with Marxist ties? The rabid Republican assassination squad will have a field day with this.Bernie is a fine man. But I just don't see it.</comment>

<comment>Excellent article!  Clinton is an "incrementalist" who works within the corporate power structure to affect change around the edges.Bernie Sanders wants to transform politics and wants radical change.</comment>

<comment>You don't get tens of millions from Wall Street, including a couple of million in her personal piggy bank, for nothing. She refuses to release the transcripts of her $250,000 lunch talks with Wall Street. What did she say that was worth that much to that crowd?It is actions like this that make even older progressives completely distrust her. Our legal system depends on the ability of ordinary citizens to hear opposing sides in court and decide on not only evidence, but on the impression of the speaker , who is telling the truth. This has been proven many times to be a seriously flawed concept, but nontheless, Hillary flunks this test badly. Even if most people can't really articulate a good reason to distrust her, she just inspires mistrust.</comment>

<comment>Why is she increasingly dressing like a character from a science fiction movie set in the distant future?</comment>

<comment>The Clinton's are corrupt taking money from Wall Street with one hand and carrying on how she is going to control big money (Wall Street). You have to laugh out loud.</comment>

<comment>She's authentically dishonest. I get it.</comment>

